California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
-------------------------------------------

700.130.

To levy upon a security, the levying officer shall comply with Section 8112 of the Commercial Code. The legal process referred to in Section 8112 of the Commercial Code means the legal process required by the state in which the chief executive office of the issuer of the security is located and, where that state is California, means personal service by the levying officer of a copy of the writ of execution and notice of levy on the person who is to be served.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

700.140.

(a) Subject to Sections 684.115 and 700.160, to levy upon a deposit account, the levying officer shall personally serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the financial institution with which the deposit account is maintained.

(b) The execution lien that arises upon service of a writ of execution and notice of
 levy reaches only amounts in a deposit account at the time of service on the financial institution, including the amount of any deposit not yet finally collected unless the deposit is returned unpaid to the financial institution.

(c) The levying officer shall serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on any third person in whose name any deposit account described therein stands. Service shall be made personally or by mail as follows:

(1) At the time of levy or promptly thereafter, if the party seeking the levy informs the levying officer of the person and his, her, or its residence or business address.

(2) Promptly following the levying officer’s receipt of a garnishee’s memorandum if service was not accomplished pursuant to paragraph (1) if the garnishee’s memorandum identifies the person and his,
 her, or its residence or business address.

(d) The financial institution shall not honor a withdrawal request or a check or other order for the payment of money from the deposit account if presentment of the withdrawal request or item to the financial institution occurs during the time the execution lien is in effect unless, following the withdrawal or payment, sufficient funds are available to cover the levy. For these purposes, a withdrawal from the deposit account to cover the financial institution’s standard fee or charge for processing the levy shall not be considered a payment of money from the account in violation of this subdivision.

(e) During the time the execution lien is in effect, the financial institution is not liable to any person for any of the following:

(1) Performance of the duties of a garnishee
 under the levy.

(2) Nonpayment of a check or other order for the payment or transfer of money drawn or presented against the deposit account if the nonpayment is pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (d).

(3) Refusal to pay a withdrawal from the deposit account if the refusal is pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (d).

(f) When the amount levied upon pursuant to this section is paid to the levying officer, the execution lien on the deposit account levied upon terminates.

(g) For the purposes of this section, none of the following is a third person in whose name the deposit account stands:

(1) A person who is only a person named as the beneficiary of a Totten trust
 account.

(2) A person who is only a payee designated in a pay-on-death provision in an account pursuant to Section 18318.5 of the Financial Code or Section 5140 of the Probate Code, or other similar provision.

(3) A person who is only acting in a representative or custodial capacity with respect to benefits paid or payable by the United States government. Rather, accounts maintained by the representative or custodian shall be deemed to stand in the beneficiary’s name, and the amounts therein shall be covered by a levy against the beneficiary.

(h) For purposes of this section, final payment of a deposit shall be deemed to have occurred in accordance with Section 4215 or 11210 of the Commercial Code or with automated clearinghouse or Federal Reserve System rule, regulation, operating circular, or similar governing
 document, as applicable to the deposit. If, for any reason, a deposit is returned by the financial institution upon which it is drawn, the deposit shall not be deemed finally collected for purposes of this subdivision regardless of any later payment by the financial institution upon which the deposit is drawn.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 484, Sec. 8.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

700.150.

(a) Subject to Section 700.160, to levy upon property in a safe-deposit box, the levying officer shall personally serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the financial institution with which the safe-deposit box is maintained.

(b) At the time of the levy or promptly thereafter, the levying officer shall serve a
 copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on any third person in whose name the safe-deposit box stands. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(c) During the time the execution lien is in effect, the financial institution may not permit the removal of any of the contents of the safe-deposit box except as directed by the levying officer.

(d) Upon receipt of a garnishee’s memorandum from the financial institution indicating a safe-deposit box is under levy, the levying officer shall promptly mail a written notice to the judgment creditor demanding an additional fee as required by Section 26723 of the Government Code, plus the costs to open the safe-deposit box and seize and store the contents. The levying officer shall release the levy on the safe-deposit box if the judgment creditor does not pay the required fee, plus costs, within three business days plus the
 extended time period specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1013 for service by mail by the levying officer.

(e) The levying officer may first give the person in whose name the safe-deposit box stands an opportunity to open the safe-deposit box to permit the removal pursuant to the levy of the property levied upon. The financial institution may refuse to permit the forcible opening of the safe-deposit box to permit the removal of the property levied upon unless the levying officer or the judgment creditor pays in advance the cost of forcibly opening the safe-deposit box and of repairing any damage caused thereby.

(f) The levying officer shall give the judgment creditor at least three court days’ advance notice of the date and time the levying officer will open the safe-deposit box and seize the contents thereof, and the judgment creditor shall be entitled to be present at that
 time.

(g) During the time the execution lien is in effect, the financial institution is not liable to any person for any of the following:

(1) Performance of the duties of a garnishee under the levy.

(2) Refusal to permit access to the safe-deposit box by the person in whose name it stands.

(3) Removal of any of the contents of the safe-deposit box pursuant to the levy.

(h) If the levying officer removes any property from the safe-deposit box to satisfy the levy, but allows other property to remain in the safe-deposit box, the execution lien is released automatically with respect to any property that remains in the safe-deposit box.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 484, Sec. 9.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

700.160.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a deposit account or safe-deposit box standing in the name of a person other than the judgment debtor, either alone or together with third persons, is not subject to levy under Section 700.140 or 700.150 unless the legal process served on the third party includes a court order authorizing the levy.

(b) A court order is not required to levy on a deposit account or safe-deposit box standing in the name of any of the following:

(1) The judgment debtor, whether alone or together with third persons.

(2) The judgment debtor’s spouse or registered domestic partner, whether alone or together with other persons, provided an affidavit is delivered to the financial institution at the time of levy showing that person is the judgment debtor’s spouse or registered domestic partner.

(3) A fictitious business name, provided a copy of an unexpired statement certified in accordance with Section 17926 of the Business and Professions Code is delivered to the financial institution at the time of levy, the fictitious business name statement does not list any person other
 than the judgment debtor, the judgment debtor’s spouse or the judgment debtor’s registered domestic partner as the person or persons doing business under the fictitious business name, and, if a person other than the judgment debtor is listed in the statement, an affidavit stating that the other person is the judgment debtor’s spouse or registered domestic partner is delivered to the financial institution at the time of the levy.

(4) The additional name of a judgment debtor listed on the legal process pursuant to an affidavit of identity as provided by Section 680.135, whether alone or together with third persons.

(c) In any case where a deposit account in the name of a person other than the judgment debtor, whether alone or together with the judgment debtor, is levied upon, the financial institution shall not pay to the levying officer the amount levied upon until being notified
 to do so by the levying officer. The levying officer may not require the financial institution to pay the amount levied upon until the expiration of 15 days after service of notice of levy on the third person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 484, Sec. 10.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

700.170.

(a) Unless another method of levy is provided by this article, to levy upon an account receivable or general intangible, the levying officer shall personally serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the account debtor.

(b) If a levy is made under subdivision (a) and payments on the account receivable or general intangible are made to a person other than the judgment debtor (whether pursuant to a security agreement, assignment for collection, or otherwise), the levying officer shall, if so instructed by the judgment creditor, personally serve a
 copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on such third person. Service of the copy of the writ and notice of levy on such third person is a levy on any amounts owed to the judgment debtor by such third person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

700.180.

(a) The following property may be levied upon pursuant to this article notwithstanding that the property levied upon is the subject of a pending action or special proceeding:

(1) Real property.

(2) Growing crops, timber to be cut, or minerals or the like (including oil and gas) to be extracted or accounts receivable resulting from the sale thereof at the wellhead or minehead.

(3) Tangible personal property in the possession or under the
 control of the judgment debtor or in the custody of a levying officer.

(4) The interest of a judgment debtor in personal property in the estate of a decedent, whether the interest arises by testate or intestate succession.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), a levy upon property that is the subject of an action or special proceeding pending at the time of the levy is not effective.

(c) If a levy is attempted but is ineffective under subdivision (b) and the levying officer has requested a garnishee’s memorandum under Section 701.030 in connection with the ineffective levy, the garnishee’s memorandum shall include the following information in addition to that required by Section 701.030:

(1) A statement that the levy on the property is not
 effective because the property is the subject of a pending action or special proceeding.

(2) The title of the court, cause, and number of the pending action or proceeding.

(d) For the purpose of this section, an action or proceeding is pending from the time the action or proceeding is commenced until judgment has been entered and the time for appeal has expired or, if an appeal is filed, until the appeal has been finally determined.

(e) Nothing in this section affects or limits the right of the judgment creditor to obtain a lien pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 708.410) of Chapter 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

700.190.

(a) As used in this section, “final money judgment” means a money judgment after the time for appeal from the judgment has expired or, if an appeal is filed, after the appeal has been finally determined.

(b) To levy upon a final money judgment, the levying officer shall file a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy with the clerk of the court that entered the final money judgment. The court clerk shall endorse upon the judgment a statement of the existence of the execution lien and the time it was created. If an abstract of the judgment is issued,
 it shall include a statement of the execution lien in favor of the judgment creditor.

(c) At the time of levy or promptly thereafter, the levying officer shall serve a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on the judgment debtor obligated to pay the final money judgment levied upon. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 25.3.)
-------------------------------------------

700.200.

(a) To levy upon the interest of the judgment debtor in personal property in the estate of a decedent, whether the interest arises by testate or intestate succession, the levying officer shall personally serve a copy of the writ and a notice of levy on the personal representative of the decedent. The levy does not impair the powers of the representative over the property for the purposes of administration.

(b) The personal representative shall report the levy to the court in which the estate is being administered when any petition for distribution is filed. If a
 decree orders distribution to the judgment debtor, the court making the decree shall order the property levied upon to be delivered to the levying officer. The property may not be delivered to the levying officer until the decree distributing the property has become final. To the extent the property delivered to the levying officer is not necessary to satisfy the money judgment, it shall be released to the judgment debtor.

(c) Promptly after the property is delivered to the levying officer pursuant to subdivision (b), the levying officer shall serve a notice describing the property on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. Notwithstanding Section 703.520, a claim of exemption for the property described in the notice may be made within 10 days after the notice was served on the judgment debtor.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 697.710, an execution lien
 created by a levy pursuant to this section continues for a period of one year after the decree distributing the interest has become final unless the judgment is sooner satisfied.

(e) A writ under which a levy is made pursuant to this section shall be returned not later than one year after the date the decree distributing the interest has become final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Duties and Liabilities of Third Persons After Levy [701.010. - 701.070.]

701.010.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, when a levy is made by service of a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on a third person, the third person at the time of levy or promptly thereafter shall comply with this section.

(b) Unless the third person has good cause for failure or refusal to do so:

(1) The third person shall deliver to the levying officer any of the property levied upon that is in the possession or under the control of the third person at the time of levy unless
 the third person claims the right to possession of the property.

(2) To the extent that the third person does not deny an obligation levied upon, or claim a priority over the judgment creditor’s lien, the third person shall pay to the levying officer both of the following:

(A) The amount of the obligation levied upon that is due and payable to the judgment debtor at the time of levy.

(B) Amounts that become due and payable to the judgment debtor on the obligation levied upon during the period of the execution lien.

(3) If the third person makes a delivery or payment to the levying officer pursuant to this section, the third person shall execute and deliver any documents necessary to effect the transfer of the property.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “good cause” includes, but is not limited to, a showing that the third person did not know or have reason to know of the levy from all the facts and circumstances known to the third person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.020.

(a) If a third person is required by this article to deliver property to the levying officer or to make payments to the levying officer and the third person fails or refuses without good cause to do so, the third person is liable to the judgment creditor for whichever of the following is the lesser amount: 

(1) The value of the judgment debtor’s interest in the property or the amount of the payments required to be made.

(2) The amount required to satisfy the judgment pursuant to which the levy is
 made.

(b) The third person’s liability continues until the earliest of the following times:

(1) The time when the property levied upon is delivered to the levying officer or the payments are made to the levying officer.

(2) The time when the property levied upon is released pursuant to Section 699. 060.

(3) The time when the judgment is satisfied or discharged.

(c) If the third person’s liability is established, the court that determines the liability may, in its discretion, require the third person to pay the costs and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the judgment creditor in establishing the liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.030.

(a) At the time of service of a copy of the legal process on a third person, the levying officer shall request the third person to give the levying officer a garnishee’s memorandum containing the information required by this section. Within 10 days after the legal process is served, the third person shall mail or deliver the garnishee’s memorandum to the levying officer whether or not the levy is effective.

(b) The garnishee’s memorandum shall be executed under oath and shall contain the following information, as applicable:

(1) A description of any property of the judgment debtor sought to be levied upon that is not delivered to the levying officer and the reason for not delivering the
 property.

(2) A description of any property of the judgment debtor not sought to be levied upon that is in the possession or under the control of the third person at the time of levy.

(3) A statement of the amount and terms of any obligation to the judgment debtor sought to be levied upon that is due and payable and is not paid to the levying officer, and the reason for not paying the obligation.

(4) A statement of the amount and terms of any obligation to the judgment debtor sought to be levied upon that is not due and payable at the time of levy.

(5) A statement of the amount and terms of any obligation to the judgment debtor at the time of levy not sought to be levied upon.

(6) A
 description of claims and rights of other persons to the property or obligation levied upon that are known to the third person and the names and addresses of those other persons.

(7) A statement that the garnishee holds neither any property nor any obligations in favor of the judgment debtor.

(c) If a garnishee’s memorandum is received from the third person, the levying officer shall retain a copy and promptly mail or deliver a copy of the memorandum to the judgment creditor.

(d) Except as provided in subdivisions (e) and (f), if a third person does not give the levying officer a garnishee’s memorandum within the time provided in subdivision (a), or does not provide complete information, the third person may, in the court’s discretion, be required to pay the costs and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in any
 proceedings to obtain the information required in the garnishee’s memorandum.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when the levy is made upon a deposit account or upon property in a safe-deposit box, the financial institution need not give a garnishee’s memorandum to the levying officer if the financial institution fully complies with the levy and, if a garnishee’s memorandum is required, the garnishee’s memorandum needs to provide information with respect only to property that is carried on the records available at the office or branch where the levy is made provided that if a levy has been served at a central location designated by a financial institution in accordance with Section 684.115, the garnishee’s memorandum shall apply to all offices and branches of the financial institution except to the extent acceptance of the levy at those central locations is limited pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (b) of Section 684.115.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the third person need not give a garnishee’s memorandum to the levying officer if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The third person has delivered to the levying officer all of the property sought to be levied upon.

(2) The third person has paid to the levying officer the amount due at the time of levy on any obligation to the judgment debtor that was levied upon, and there is no additional amount that thereafter will become payable on the obligation levied upon.

(g) The garnishee may electronically transmit the garnishee’s memorandum to the levying officer pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 263) of Title 4 of Part
 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 222, Sec. 3.   (AB 2067)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

701.035.

A third person who gives a garnishee’s memorandum pursuant to this title is not liable to any person for the disclosure in the garnishee’s memorandum of any information contained in the garnishee’s memorandum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 155, Sec. 14.6.   Effective June 30, 1983.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

701.040.

(a) Except as otherwise ordered by the court upon a determination that the judgment creditor’s lien has priority over the security interest, if property levied upon is subject to a security interest that attached prior to levy, the property or obligation is subject to enforcement of the security interest without regard to the levy unless the property is in the custody of the levying officer; but, if the execution lien has
 priority over the security interest, the secured party is liable to the judgment creditor for any proceeds received by the secured party from the property to the extent of the execution lien.

(b) After the security interest is satisfied, the secured party shall deliver any excess property, and pay any excess payments or proceeds of property, remaining in the possession of the secured party to the levying officer for the purposes of the levy, as provided in Section 9615 of the Commercial Code, unless otherwise ordered by the court or directed by the levying officer.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1125, Sec. 1.5) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 24.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Amending action operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.   Section initially operative (in amended form) January 1, 2002, pursuant to Stats. 1990, Ch. 1125, Sec. 5, as amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 932.)
-------------------------------------------

701.050.

After service of a copy of the writ of execution and a notice of levy on an account debtor obligated on an account receivable, chattel paper, or general intangible:

(a) If the account debtor has been making payments or is required to make payments to the judgment debtor, the account debtor shall make payments to the levying officer as they become due unless otherwise directed by court order or by the levying officer. Payments made to the judgment debtor after the account debtor has received notice of the levy do not discharge the obligation of the account debtor to make payments as
 required by this subdivision.

(b) If the account debtor has been making payments to a third person or is required to make payments to a third person (whether pursuant to a security agreement, assignment for collection, or otherwise), the account debtor shall continue to make such payments to the third person notwithstanding the levy until the account debtor receives notice that the obligation to the third person is satisfied or is otherwise directed by court order or by the third person. After the account debtor receives notice that the obligation to the third person is satisfied, the account debtor shall make payments to the levying officer as they become due unless otherwise directed by court order or by the levying officer.

(c) If pursuant to a security agreement the judgment debtor has liberty to accept the return of goods or make repossessions under the account receivable or
 chattel paper, the account debtor shall deliver to the levying officer property returnable to the judgment debtor unless otherwise directed by court order or by the levying officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.060.

If the levying officer obtains custody of an instrument levied upon and serves the obligor under the instrument pursuant to the levy, the obligor shall make payments to the levying officer as they become due. Payments made to a person other than the levying officer do not discharge the obligation of the obligor to make payments as required by this section if the payments are made after the obligor has received notice of the levy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.070.

If a final money judgment has been levied upon and the levying officer has served the judgment debtor under the final money judgment levied upon, the judgment debtor shall make any payments due under the judgment to the levying officer. Payments made to a person other than the levying officer do not discharge the obligation of the judgment debtor under the final money judgment levied upon if the payments are made after the judgment debtor has received notice of the levy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 25.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Sale and Collection [701.510. - 701.680.]

701.510.

Subject to Sections 687.020 and 701.520, the levying officer shall sell all property that has been levied upon except:

(a) Tangible personal property may not be sold until the levying officer obtains custody of the property.

(b) Cash may not be sold unless it has a value exceeding its face value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.520.

(a) Except as provided in this section, any of the following property that has been levied upon shall be collected rather than sold:

(1) Accounts receivable.

(2) Chattel paper.

(3) General intangibles.

(4) Final money judgments.

(5) Instruments that are not customarily transferred in an established market.
 

(6) Instruments that represent an obligation arising out of the sale or lease of property, a license to use property, the furnishing of services, or the loan of money where the property sold or leased or licensed for use, the services furnished, or the money loaned was used by an individual primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(b) At the time of levy on property described in subdivision (a) or thereafter, the judgment creditor may serve a notice of intended sale of the property on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. A copy of the notice of intended sale and proof of service on the judgment debtor shall be filed with the court and with the levying officer. The notice of intended sale shall describe the property and state that it will be sold at an execution sale unless, within the time allowed after service of the notice of intended
 sale, the judgment debtor applies to the court on noticed motion for an order that the property be collected rather than sold.

(c) Within 10 days after service of the notice of intended sale, the judgment debtor may apply to the court on noticed motion for an order that the property be collected rather than sold. A judgment debtor who so applies shall, within the time allowed for the application, serve a copy of the notice of motion on the judgment creditor and file a copy of the notice of motion with the levying officer. Service of the copy of the notice of motion on the judgment creditor shall be made personally or by mail. If the copy of the notice of motion is not filed with the levying officer within the time allowed, the levying officer shall proceed to sell the property. If a copy of the notice of motion is filed with the levying officer within the time allowed, the levying officer shall continue to collect the property until otherwise
 ordered by the court.

(d) At the hearing on the motion, the court may in its discretion order that the property be sold or be collected depending on the equities and circumstances of the particular case. If the court orders that the property be sold, the order may specify terms and conditions of sale. If the court orders that the property be collected, the court may condition its order on an assignment of the property by the judgment debtor to the judgment creditor pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 708.510) of Chapter 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.530.

(a) Notice of sale of personal property shall be in writing, shall state the date, time, and place of sale, and shall describe the property to be sold.

(b) Not less than 10 days before a sale of personal property, notice of sale shall be posted and served on the judgment debtor by the levying officer. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(c) Posting under this section shall be in three public
 places in:

(1) The city in which the property is to be sold if it is to be sold in a city.

(2) The county in which the property is to be sold if it is not to be sold in a city.

(d) A sale of personal property of an individual may not take place until the expiration of the time during which the judgment debtor may make a claim of exemption under subdivision (a) of Section 703.520.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

701.540.

(a) Notice of sale of an interest in real property shall be in writing, shall state the date, time, and place of sale, shall describe the interest to be sold, and shall give a legal description of the real property and its street address or other common designation, if any. If the real property has no street address or other common designation, the notice of sale shall include a statement that
 directions to its location may be obtained from the levying officer upon oral or written request or, in the discretion of the levying officer, the notice of sale may contain directions to its location. Directions are sufficient if information as to the location of the real property is given by reference to the direction and approximate distance from the nearest crossroads, frontage road, or access road. If an accurate legal description of the real property is given, the validity of the notice and sale is not affected by the fact that the street address or other common designation, or directions to its location, are erroneous or omitted.

(b) Not less than 20 days before the date of sale, notice of sale of an interest in real property shall be served, mailed, and posted by the levying officer as provided in subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f).

(c) Notice of sale shall be served on
 the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(d) Notice of sale shall be posted in the following places:

(1) One public place in the city in which the interest in the real property is to be sold if it is to be sold in a city or, if not to be sold in a city, one public place in the county in which the interest in the real property is to be sold.

(2) A conspicuous place on the real property.

(e) At the time notice is posted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), notice of sale shall be served or service shall be attempted on one occupant of the real property. Service on the occupant shall be made by leaving the notice with the occupant personally or, in the occupant’s absence, with any person of suitable age and discretion
 found upon the real property at the time service is attempted who is either an employee or agent of the occupant or a member of the occupant’s household. If the levying officer is unable to serve an occupant, as specified, at the time service is attempted, the levying officer is not required to make any further attempts to serve an occupant.

(f) If the property described in the notice of sale consists of more than one distinct lot, parcel, or governmental subdivision and any of the lots, parcels, or governmental subdivisions lies with relation to any of the others so as to form one or more continuous, unbroken tracts, only one service pursuant to subdivision (e) and posting pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) need be made as to each continuous, unbroken tract.

(g) Notice of sale shall be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code, with the first publication
 at least 20 days prior to the time of sale, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city in which the real property or a part thereof is situated if any part thereof is situated in a city or, if not, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the public notice district in which the real property or a part thereof is situated. If no newspaper of general circulation is published in the city or public notice district, notice of sale shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the real property or a part thereof is situated.

(h) Not earlier than 30 days after the date of levy, the judgment creditor shall determine the names of all persons having liens on the real property on the date of levy that are of record in the office of the county recorder and shall instruct the levying officer to mail notice of sale to each lienholder at the address used by the county recorder for the return of the
 instrument creating the lien after recording. The levying officer shall mail notice to each lienholder, at the address given in the instructions, not less than 20 days before the date of sale.

(i) For the purposes of this section, publication of notice in a public notice district is governed by Chapter 1.1 (commencing with Section 6080) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 703, Sec. 9.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

701.545.

Notice of sale of an interest in real property, other than a leasehold estate with an unexpired term of less than two years at the time of levy, may not be given pursuant to Section 701.540 until the expiration of 120 days after the date notice of levy on the interest in real property was served on the judgment debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.547.

A notice of sale shall contain the substance of the following statement: “Prospective bidders should refer to Sections 701.510 to 701.680, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure for provisions governing the terms, conditions, and effect of the sale and the liability of defaulting bidders.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.550.

(a) In addition to the notice of sale required by this article, the levying officer shall, at the time notice of sale is posted pursuant to Section 701.530 or 701.540, mail notice of sale to any person who has requested notice of the sale pursuant to this section.

(b) A request for notice of sale under this section made prior to the issuance of the writ shall be in writing and shall be filed with the clerk of the court where the judgment is entered. The request shall specify the title of the court, the cause and number of the action in which the judgment was
 entered, and the date of entry thereof, and shall state the address to which the notice of sale is to be mailed. The name and address of the person requesting notice of sale under this subdivision shall be noted on the writ.

(c) A person who desires notice of sale of particular property that has been levied upon may file a request for notice of sale with the levying officer who will conduct the sale. The request shall contain the information specified by the levying officer as needed in order to comply with the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.555.

In addition to the notice of sale required by this article, the judgment creditor may advertise the sale in the classified or other advertising section of a newspaper of general circulation or other publication and may recover reasonable costs of such advertising. The judgment debtor may also advertise the sale at the judgment debtor’s own expense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.560.

(a) Failure to give notice of sale as required by this article does not invalidate the sale.

(b) A levying officer who sells property without giving the required notice is liable to the judgment creditor and the judgment debtor for actual damages caused by failure to give notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

701.570.

(a) A sale of property shall be held at the date, time, and place specified in the notice of sale, which shall be in the county where the property or a part thereof is situated and between the hours of nine in the morning and five in the afternoon. Subject to subdivision (d), real property consisting of one parcel, or of two or more contiguous parcels, situated in two or more counties may be sold in one county as instructed by the judgment creditor.
